en: Baby & Toddler Clothing Accessories
xx: Baby & Toddler Clothing Accessories
cs: Doplňky k dětskému oblečení
da: Tilbehør til babyer og småbørn
de: Zubehör für Baby- & Kleinkindbekleidung
es: Accesorios para ropa de bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Accessoires d'habillement pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Accessori di abbigliamento per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー服小物
nl: Kledingaccessoires voor baby's en peuters
no: Klestilbehør til baby og småbarn
pl: Akcesoria do ubrań dziecięcych i niemowlęcych
pt: Acessórios de roupas para bebês e crianças
ru: Принадлежности для детской одежды
sv: Klädesaccessoarer för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Kıyafet Aksesuarları

en: Baby & Toddler Belts
xx: Baby & Toddler Belts
cs: Dětské pásky
da: Bælter til babyer og småbørn
de: Gürtel für Babys & Kleinkinder
es: Cinturones para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Ceintures pour tout-petits
it: Cinghie primi passi per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用ベルト
nl: Riemen voor baby's en peuters
no: Belter til baby og småbarn
pl: Paski dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Cintos para bebês e crianças
ru: Пояса для младенцев
sv: Bälten för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Kemerleri

en: Baby & Toddler Gloves & Mittens
xx: Baby & Toddler Gloves & Mittens
cs: Rukavice a palčáky pro miminka a batolata
da: Handsker og vanter til babyer og småbørn
de: Baby- & Kleinkindhandschuhe
es: Manoplas y guantes para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Gants et moufles pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Guanti e muffole per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用手袋
nl: Baby- en peuterhandschoentjes en -wantjes
no: Hansker og votter til baby og småbarn
pl: Rękawiczki i mitenki dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Luvas para bebês e crianças
ru: Варежки и перчатки для младенцев
sv: Handskar och vantar för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Eldiven ve Kolçakları

en: Baby & Toddler Hats
xx: Baby & Toddler Hats
cs: Dětské a kojenecké kloboučky
da: Huer til babyer og småbørn
de: Kopfbedeckungen für Babys & Kleinkinder
es: Gorros para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Bonnets pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Cappelli per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用帽子
nl: Baby- en peutermutsjes
no: Hatter/luer til baby og småbarn
pl: Kapelusze dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Chapéus de bebês e crianças
ru: Детские шапки
sv: Mössor för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Şapkaları

en: Baby Protective Wear
xx: Baby Protective Wear
cs: Dětské ochranné oblečení
da: Beskyttende babytøj
de: Babyschutzbekleidung
es: Ropa protectora para bebés
fr: Habillement de sécurité pour bébés
it: Indumenti protettivi per bebè
ja: ベビー用保護衣類
nl: Beschermende babykleding
no: Baby-beskyttelsesklær
pl: Odzież ochronna dla niemowląt
pt: Roupas de proteção para bebês
ru: Детская защитная одежда
sv: Skyddskläder för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek Koruyucu Giyim

en: Balaclavas
xx: Balaclavas
cs: Kukly
da: Elefanthuer
de: Sturmhauben
es: Pasamontañas
fr: Passe-montagnes
it: Passamontagna
ja: 目出し帽
nl: Bivakmutsen
no: Finlandshetter
pl: Kominiarki
pt: Balaclavas
ru: Балаклавы
sv: Balaklavor
tr: Kar Maskeleri

en: Bandanas & Headties
xx: Bandanas & Headties
cs: Šátky a kapesníky
da: Bandanaer og tørklæder
de: Bandanas & Stofftücher
es: Pañuelos y pañoletas
fr: Du rags\, bandanas et fichus
it: Bandane e fazzoletti
ja: バンダナ・ヘッドスカーフ
nl: Bandana's en hoofddoeken
no: Tørkler og skaut
pl: Bandany i chusty na głowę
pt: Bandanas e lenços de cabeça
ru: Банданы и косынки
sv: Snusnäsdukar och huvuddukar
tr: Bandanalar ve Eşarplar

en: Bandanas
xx: Bandanas
cs: Šátky
da: Bandanaer
de: Bandanas
es: Bandanas
fr: Bandanas
it: Bandane
ja: バンダナ
nl: Bandana's
no: Bandanaer
pl: Bandany
pt: Bandanas
ru: Банданы
sv: Bandanas
tr: Bandana Örtüleri

en: Hair Care Wraps
xx: Hair Care Wraps
cs: Šátky na péči o vlasy
da: Hårbånd til hårpleje
de: Wickeltücher für die Haare
es: Envolturas para el cuidado del pelo
fr: Charlottes pour soins des cheveux
it: Foulard per capelli
ja: スカーフターバン
nl: Verzorgende haardoeken
no: Hårpleiehetter
pl: Turbany do zabiegów pielęgnacyjnych
pt: Toucas para cuidados com o cabelo
ru: Шапочки для ухода за волосами
sv: Hårhanddukar
tr: Saç Bakım Sargıları

en: Belt Buckles
xx: Belt Buckles
cs: Přezky na řemeny
da: Bæltespænder
de: Gürtelschnallen
es: Hebillas
fr: Boucles de ceinture
it: Fibbie di cinture
ja: バックル
nl: Gespen
no: Beltespenner
pl: Sprzączki do pasków
pt: Fivelas de cintos
ru: Пряжки для ремней
sv: Bältesspännen
tr: Kemer Tokaları

en: Belts
xx: Belts
cs: Opasky
da: Bælter
de: Gürtel
es: Cinturones
fr: Ceintures, Ceinture en cuir
it: Cinture
ja: ベルト
nl: Riemen
no: Belter
pl: Paski
pt: Cintos
ru: Поясные ремни
sv: Bälten
tr: Kemerler

en: Bridal Accessories
xx: Bridal Accessories
cs: Svatební doplňky
da: Brudetilbehør
de: Braut-Accessoires
es: Accesorios de novia
fr: Accessoires de mariage
it: Accessori sposa
ja: ウェディング小物
nl: Bruidsaccessoires
no: Brudetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria dla panny młodej
pt: Acessórios para noivas
ru: Принадлежности для невест
sv: Brudaccessoarer
tr: Gelinlik Aksesuarları

en: Bridal Veils
xx: Bridal Veils
cs: Svatební závoje
da: Brudeslør
de: Brautschleier
es: Velos de novia
fr: Voiles de mariée
it: Veli da sposa
ja: ウェディングベール
nl: Bruidssluiers
no: Brudeslør
pl: Welony ślubne
pt: Véus de noiva
ru: Фата
sv: Brudslöjor
tr: Duvaklar

en: Button Studs
xx: Button Studs
cs: Ozdobné knoflíky
da: Trykknapper
de: Knopfnieten
es: Cubrebotones
fr: Boutons-pression
it: Borchie per bottoni
ja: スタッドボタン
nl: Sierspijkers
no: Knappenagler
pl: Spinki
pt: Botões de pressão
ru: Сменные пуговицы
sv: Lösa knappar
tr: Çakma Düğmeler

en: Collar Stays
xx: Collar Stays
cs: Výztuhy límců
da: Flipstivere
de: Kragenstäbchen
es: Ballenas para cuellos
fr: Baleines de cols
it: Tendicollo
ja: 襟芯
nl: Kraagsteunen
no: Kragestivere
pl: Usztywnienia kołnierzyka
pt: Pastilhas de colarinho
ru: Упругие пластинки для воротников
sv: Kraglattor
tr: Yaka Balenleri

en: Cufflinks
xx: Cufflinks
cs: Manžetové knoflíčky
da: Manchetknapper
de: Manschettenknöpfe
es: Gemelos
fr: Boutons de manchette
it: Gemelli da camicia
ja: カフスボタン
nl: Manchetknopen
no: Mansjettknapper
pl: Spinki do mankietów
pt: Abotoaduras
ru: Запонки
sv: Manschettknappar
tr: Kol Düğmeleri

en: Decorative Fans
xx: Decorative Fans
cs: Ozdobné vějíře
da: Vifter
de: Fächer
es: Abanicos decorativos
fr: Éventails décoratifs
it: Ventagli decorativi
ja: 扇子
nl: Decoratieve waaiers
no: Dekorative vifter
pl: Wachlarze dekoracyjne
pt: Leques decorativos
ru: Декоративные веера
sv: Solfjädrar
tr: Dekoratif Yelpazeler

en: Earmuffs
xx: Earmuffs
cs: Klapky na uši
da: Ørevarmere
de: Ohrenschützer
es: Orejeras
fr: Cache-oreilles
it: Paraorecchie
ja: 耳あて
nl: Oorwarmers
no: Øreklokker
pl: Nauszniki
pt: Abafadores
ru: Наушники от холода
sv: Öronmuffar
tr: Kulak Koruyucular

en: Gloves & Mittens
xx: Gloves & Mittens
cs: Rukavice a palčáky
da: Handsker og vanter
de: Handschuhe & Fausthandschuhe
es: Guantes y mitones
fr: Gants et moufles
it: Guanti e muffole
ja: 手袋・グローブ
nl: Handschoenen en wanten
no: Hansker og votter
pl: Rękawiczki i mitenki
pt: Luvas e mitenes
ru: Перчатки и варежки
sv: Handskar och vantar
tr: Eldivenler ve Kolçaklar

en: Fingerless Gloves
fr: Mitaines, Mitaine